examples/short-example.dix
<dictionary type="separable">
  <alphabet>
    ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVW
    XYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyziǎšěřčžǔůýệướễăạảðÐđ
  </alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="adj">
      <e><i><w/><s n="adj"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i><w/><s n="adj"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adv">
      <e><i><w/><s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cnjcoo">
      <e><i><w/><s n="cnjcoo"/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="det">
      <e><i><w/><s n="det"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="det-pos">
      <e><i><w/><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n">
      <e><i><w/><s n="n"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="np">
      <e><i><w/><s n="np"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="num">
      <e><i><w/><s n="num"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i><w/><s n="num"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prn">
      <e><i><w/><s n="prn"/><t/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="modifier-n">
      <e><par n="adj"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="adj"/><par n="adj"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="adj"/><par n="cnjcoo"/><par n="adj"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="num"/><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="num"/><par n="adj"/><par n="n"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="det-modifier-n">
      <e><par n="det"/><par n="modifier-n"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="freq-adv">
      <e><i>always<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>anually<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>bianually<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>constantly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>daily<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>eventually<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>ever<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>frequently<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>generally<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>hourly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>monthly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>never<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>nightly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>normally<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>occasionally<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>often<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>quarterly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>rarely<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>regularly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>seldom<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>semi-anually<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>sometimes<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>weekly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
      <e><i>yearly<s n="adv"/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="person">
      <e><par n="np"/></e>
      <e><par n="prn"/></e>
      <e><par n="det-modifier-n"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="SA">
      <e><par n="adj"/><par n="cnjcoo"/><par n="adj"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="SAdv">
      <e><par n="adv"/></e>
      <e><par n="adv"/><par n="freq-adv"/></e>
      <e><par n="freq-adv"/></e>
      <e><par n="freq-adv"/><par n="adv"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="SN">
      <e><par n="n"/></e>
      <e><par n="np"/></e>
      <e><par n="prn"/></e>
      <e><par n="modifier-n"/></e>
      <e><par n="det-modifier-n"/></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">

    <e lm="take out" c="sacar">
      <p><l>take</l><r>take<g><b/>out</g></r></p><i><s n="vblex"/><t/><j/></i>
      <par n="SN"/><p><l>out<t/></l><r></r></p>
    </e>

    <!--
    take off prominence
    throw off balance
    hold responsible
    take into account
    remand in custody
    remand on bail
    coil up
    depend on
    buoy up
    pay out
    serve up
    make compatible
    dig up
  -->

</section>
</dictionary>

<!--
<b/> = blank
<w/> = ANY_CHAR (loop)
<t/> = ANY_TAG (loop)
<j/> = <$>

Available:
<c/> <d/> <f/> <h/> <k/> <m/> <n/> <o/> <q/> <t/> <u/> <v/> <w/> <x/> <y/> <z/>

Taken:
<a/>
<b/>
<e/>
<g/>
<i/>
<j/>
<l/>
<p/>
<r/>
<s/>
 -->
